Hawaii statutes.
§804-38 Offense against other than
complainant; arrest. Any person who knows or has reason to suspect that
any offense against the person or property of another is intended to be
committed, may apply to a district judge, who shall hear the proof, and if the
district judge is convinced of the existence of the intention, shall cause the
person accused to be arrested, and compelled to give security in the manner
above directed. [PC 1869, c 47, §7; RL 1925, §4003; RL 1935, §5457; RL 1945,
§10757; RL 1955, §256-37; HRS §709-38; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next